Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-607] Administrative files and
opinions. (a) The commissioner shall maintain, or designate a person to
maintain, a register of applications for registration of securities;
registration statements; notice filings; applications for registration of broker-dealers,
agents, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives; notice
filings by federal covered investment advisers that are or have been effective
under this chapter or the predecessor act; notices of claims of exemption from
registration or notice filing requirements contained in a record; orders issued
under this chapter or the predecessor act; and interpretative opinions or no
action determinations issued under this chapter.

(b) The commissioner shall make all rules,
forms, interpretative opinions, and orders available to the public in
accordance with chapter 92F.

(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of a
record that is a public record or a certification that the public record does
not exist to a person that so requests in accordance with chapter 92F. A copy
of the record certified or a certificate by the commissioner of a record's
nonexistence is prima facie evidence of a record or its nonexistence. [L 2006,
c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next